North Carolina statutes. Chapter 127A. Militia.
Article 11. Support of Militia.

§ 127A-137.
Requisition for federal funds.

The Governor shall make requisition upon the secretary of the appropriate service for the State allotment from federal funds as may be appropriate for the support of the militia.

History.

1917, c. 200, s. 23; C.S., s. 6887; 1921, c. 120, s. 10; 1963, c. 1019, s. 8; 1975, c. 604, s. 2; 2011-195, s. 1(a).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2011-195, s. 1(a), effective June 23, 2011, substituted “the State allotment” for “such State allotment.”

§ 127A-138.
Local appropriations; unit funds.

Every municipality and county within the State is hereby authorized and empowered to appropriate for the benefit of any unit or units of the militia the amounts of public funds from year to year as the governing body of the municipality or county may deem wise, patriotic and expedient; and is further authorized, either alone or in connection with others, to provide heat, electricity, water, telephone service and other costs of operation and maintenance of any armory. These appropriations may be funded by the levy of property taxes pursuant to

G.S. 153A-149

and

G.S. 160A-209

or by the allocation of other revenues whose use is not otherwise restricted by law.

Any funds donated to any unit or units of the militia by local governments, civic organizations or private sources, short-term rental of their armory buildings, or funds earned through vending machine commissions and items of similar nature shall remain at the unit or units to be expended in accordance with rules and regulations prescribed by the Secretary.

History.

1947, c. 1010, s. 8; 1975, c. 604, s. 2; 1979, c. 701, s. 1; 2011-195, s. 1(a).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2011-195, s. 1(a), effective June 23, 2011, in subsection (a), in the last sentence, substituted “These appropriations” for “Such appropriations” and “G.S. 160A-209” for “160A-209,” and made minor stylistic changes.

§ 127A-139.
Allowances made to different organizations and personnel.

There may be allowed each year to the following officers, under rules and regulations prescribed by the Secretary of Public Safety, as follows: to general officers, and commanders of divisions, corps, groups, brigades, regiments, separate battalions, squadrons or similar organizations, not to exceed two hundred and twenty-five dollars ($225.00); to commanding officers of companies, batteries, troops, detachments and similar units not to exceed two hundred dollars ($200.00); to executive officers, adjutants, plans and training officers, logistical officers and commissioned officers in comparable assignments in divisions, corps, groups, brigades, regiments, battalions, squadrons and similar organizations, not to exceed two hundred dollars ($200.00). No officer shall be entitled to receive any part of the amounts named in this subsection unless the officer has performed satisfactorily all duties required of the officer by law and regulations and has pursued any course of instruction that may from time to time be required.

There may be allowed annually to the supply sergeant of each company, battery, troop, detachment, and similar organizations, a sum of money not to exceed one hundred dollars ($100.00) for services satisfactorily performed.

There shall be allowed annually sufficient funds to be allocated by the Secretary of Public Safety among the federally recognized units of the North Carolina National Guard and their headquarters, a pistol team, a rifle team, aviation support facilities, and aviation flight activities for administrative and operating expenses, including heat, electricity, telephone, postage, office supplies and equipment, minor repairs and replacement of equipment, and any other expenses and special items of equipment not otherwise provided that may be authorized in accordance with North Carolina National Guard rules and regulations.

Repealed by Session Laws 1979, c. 701, s. 2.

The commanding officers of all organizations participating in the appropriations herein made shall render an itemized statement of all funds received from any source whatever for the support of their respective organizations in the manner and on the forms prescribed by the Secretary through the Adjutant General. Failure on the part of any officer to submit promptly when due the financial statement of the officer’s organization will be sufficient cause to withhold all appropriations for the organization.

History.

1917, c. 200, s. 97; 1919, c. 311; C.S., s. 6889; 1921, c. 120, s. 11; 1923, c. 24; 1924, c. 6; 1927, c. 227, s. 2; 1949, c. 1130, s. 5; 1951, c. 1144, s. 1; 1953, c. 1246; 1959, c. 421; 1963, c. 1020; 1967, c. 563, s. 6; 1973, c. 1460; 1975, c. 604, s. 2; 1977, c. 70, s. 2; 1979, c. 701, s. 2; 2009-281, s. 1; 2011-145, s. 19.1(g); 2011-195, s. 1(a).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2009-281, s. 1, effective July 10, 2009, substituted “National Guard” for “national guard” twice in subsection (c).

Session Laws 2011-145, s. 19.1(g), effective January 1, 2012, substituted “Public Safety” for “Crime Control and Public Safety” in subsections (a) and (c).

Session Laws 2011-195, s. 1(a), effective June 23, 2011, throughout the section, made minor stylistic changes; in subsection (c), twice inserted “North Carolina” and substituted “a pistol team, a rifle team, aviation support facilities, and aviation flight activities” for “NCNG State Pistol Team, NCNG State Rifle Team, NCARNG Aviation Support Facility, and NCARNG Aviation Flight Activity”; and in the last sentence of subsection (e), substituted “appropriations for the organization” for “appropriations for such organizations.”

§§ 127A-140 through 127A-144.

Reserved for future codification purposes.